Arkansas, session 2025, SB44.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 10-2-223 is repealed.
10-2-223. Authorization to meet during legislative recess —
Compensation.
(a) The various committees of the General Assembly that are authorized
to meet during the interim between legislative sessions are hereby authorized
to meet during a recess of the General Assembly of two (2) weeks or more in
duration.
(b) A member of the General Assembly attending meetings of his or her
assigned committees or meetings of committees to which he or she is invited
by the chair or chairs during the recess shall be entitled to mileage and per
diem at the same rate and from the same sources as for attending committee
meetings held after sine die adjournment of the General Assembly.


*JET012*
01/10/2025 5:06:15 PM JET012